Alaska, session 34, HB282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 29.10.200 is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 04 (68) AS 29.35.143 (regulation of automated traffic safety cameras). 05 * Sec. 2. AS 29.35 is amended by adding a new section to read: 06 Sec. 29.35.143. Automated traffic safety cameras. (a) The authority to 07 regulate automated traffic safety cameras is reserved to the state, and, except as 08 specifically provided by statute, a municipality may not ban the use of automated 09 traffic safety cameras. 10 (b) This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities. 11 (c) In this section, "automated traffic safety camera" means a device that uses 12 a vehicle sensor installed to work in conjunction with an intersection traffic control 13 system, a railroad grade crossing control system, or a speed measuring device, and a 14 camera synchronized to automatically record one or more sequential photographs or 15 electronic images of the front or rear of a motor vehicle at the time the vehicle fails to 01 stop when facing a steady red traffic control signal or an activated railroad grade 02 crossing control signal, or exceeds a speed limit as detected by a speed measuring 03 device. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.